Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 22
COAL MINE BOARD OF EXAMINERS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 3 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1988, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1988, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. sections are shown in editors' notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 34-20-102.

Section

34-22-101. Scope of article.

The provisions of this article pertain only to coal mines.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1189, § 3, effective July 1.

34-22-102. Board of examiners - created - duties - members.

There is hereby created a coal mine board of examiners, which shall have the following duties:

To establish criteria, including education and training, past and current work experience, and annual electrical retraining requirements, and to examine all applicants for positions in coal mines for which certification is required by federal law;

To issue certificates of competency to those applicants who qualify therefor;

To take disciplinary action against the holder of a certificate of competency for violation of any provision of this article, where such discipline is deemed proper based upon sufficient investigation and in accordance with this article. Disciplinary action may include, without limitation:

Denying the issuance or renewal of, suspending for a specified period, or revoking a certificate;

Issuing a letter of admonition to, or placing on probation, the holder of a certificate; or

Imposing other conditions or limitations upon a certificate or the holder thereof.

To provide assistance to the division in developing curricula for coal miner training programs;

To establish criteria for granting state certification of belt examiners, cable splicers, lamp and gas attendants, and shot-firers;

To issue cease-and-desist orders.

(1.5) When a complaint or investigation discloses an instance of conduct that does not warrant formal action by the board and, in the opinion of the board, the complaint should be dismissed, but the board has noticed indications of possible errant conduct by the holder of a certificate of competency that could lead to serious consequences if not corrected, a confidential letter of concern may be issued and sent to the holder of a certificate of competency.

The board is composed of four voting members and one nonvoting ex officio member as follows:

One member shall be a coal miner of known experience and practice in underground coal mining residing in the state of Colorado and actively engaged in the coal mining industry during the term of his office;

One member shall be a Colorado coal mine owner, operator, manager, or other mine official actively engaged in the surface coal mining industry during the term of his office;

One member shall be a Colorado mine owner, operator, manager, or other mine official actively engaged in the underground coal mining industry during the term of his office;

One member shall be an engineer experienced in coal mining; and

The commissioner, as described in section 34-21-102, or the commissioner's designee, serves as a nonvoting, ex officio member of the board.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. The term of office for each member of the board shall be four years. Any vacancies on the board shall be filled by the governor by appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term. The governor may remove any board member for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty.

Members of the board who are serving their terms of office on July 1, 1988, shall complete their terms prior to the implementation of the provisions of this section.

The coal mine board of examiners is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1189, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1932, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 377, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(c) amended and (1)(f) and (1.5) added, pp. 281, 282, §§ 1, 2, effective March 31.

L. 2020:

IP(2) and (2)(e) amended, (HB 20-1208), ch. 119, p. 495, § 3, effective June 23.

L. 2022:

(5) added, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3409, § 163, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-101 as it existed prior to 1988.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

34-22-103. Salaries and expenses of board.

The members of the board who are not state employees shall be compensated at a rate of fifty dollars per day for each day of actual service on the board and shall receive actual traveling and other expenses incurred by them in attendance at the meetings of the board and in the performance of their duties. The expenses in connection with the board shall be paid out of the general fund, or from any appropriation therefor, in accordance with the rules set forth by the state personnel board upon filing of the certificates of time and expenses of the board of examiners in the office of the controller, which certificates shall show the actual time in which each member of said board is so engaged and shall be signed by the chairman of said board and accompanied by vouchers showing the said expenses and shall be approved by the director.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1190, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-103 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-104. Board of examiners - meetings - examinations.

The board shall, by majority vote of all members, elect its chairman from among its members. The executive director of the department of natural resources, or a designee of the executive director, shall serve as administrator to the board. The office of active and inactive mines shall provide such assistance as may be necessary to the board in the performance of its duties. The board of examiners shall meet every year or more frequently, if necessary, at times and places designated by the chairman.

Examinations for certifications shall be given at such times as determined by the board to applicants for certificates of competency and at places to be determined by the division. Determination of the date and location of an examination shall be announced at least thirty days preceding the examination.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1190, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 1933, § 19, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-105 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-105. Certificate of competency.

Certificates of competency shall be required as a condition of employment for any person working in or about any coal mine in this state in positions designated by federal law.

Positions for which certification is required in underground coal mines include mine foreman, fire boss, mine electrician, shot-firer, and hoistman.

Positions for which certification is required in surface coal mines include blaster and electrician.

The board may designate such other position as may be required by federal law.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1190, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-109 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-106. Reciprocity.

The board may recognize certification by another state if such certification requirements are substantially similar to the certification requirements of this article. The holder of certification recognized as equivalent may be employed in coal mines of this state for a period to be determined by the board upon presentation of an equivalent certification from another state. The board, following review of such equivalent certification, may certify the applicant for the same position.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1190, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 34-24-101 and 34-21-109 as they existed prior to 1988.

34-22-107. Disciplinary action - procedures - grounds.

In any case in which consideration is given to taking disciplinary action against the holder of a certificate of competency issued pursuant to this article, such proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, C.R.S., and no certificate shall be revoked except according to the criteria stated in this article.

A proceeding for the taking of disciplinary action against the holder of a certificate of competency may be commenced by the office of active and inactive mines upon its own motion for good cause shown or by the filing with the office of active and inactive mines of a written complaint, signed and attested to by the complainant, stating the name of the certificate holder against whom the complaint is made, the grounds on which the complaint is made, and a description of the facts and circumstances that gave rise to the complaint. The office of active and inactive mines shall have the authority to investigate any complaint to establish good cause prior to the initiation of disciplinary proceedings.

No disciplinary action shall be lawful unless the office of active and inactive mines has first given the certificate holder notice, in writing, of the facts or conduct that may warrant such action, afforded the certificate holder an opportunity to submit written data, views, and arguments with respect to such facts or conduct and, except in cases of reckless actions or conduct that demonstrates a serious disregard for health and safety, given the certificate holder a reasonable opportunity to comply with all lawful requirements.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 282, § 6, effective March 31, 2006.)

The board shall hold a hearing within thirty days of the filing of written charges, and such hearing shall be held in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-105, C.R.S.

No certificate of competency shall be revoked except where the majority of the board finds, in writing, based on the evidence of a hearing record, that the holder of the certificate is guilty of:

Reckless disregard of applicable mining law; or

Reckless disregard for compliance with health and safety standards; or

Demonstrated incompetence in the mine which endangers life or property; or

Intentional withholding or altering of mine examination information or reports where life and property is endangered.

A written decision by the board made pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S., which includes findings of fact and conclusions of law, shall be delivered to the certificate holder within ten days after the conclusion of the hearing. The written decision will accompany a written notice of disciplinary action. Such notice shall be delivered to the certificate holder by certified mail, and the disciplinary action shall be effective upon receipt of the notice. A copy of a notice of suspension or revocation shall be mailed to any coal mine operator who employs the person whose certification has been suspended or revoked.

Final board actions and orders appropriate for judicial review may be reviewed in the court of appeals pursuant to section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S. Judicial proceedings to enforce an order or action of the board may be instituted in accordance with section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S.

The board shall decide on a case-by-case basis whether a person whose certificate has been revoked may subsequently be issued a certificate and the duration of the revocation period, and such decision shall be written in the notice of revocation.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1190, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) to (4) amended, p. 1933, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 377, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), (3), (4), and (7) amended, p. 282, § 6, effective March 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-117 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-108. Expiration of certificates.

Any certificate of competency issued pursuant to the provisions of this article shall become null and void if the certificate holder fails to be actively employed in the coal mining industry for a period of five years. This section shall not apply to federal coal mine inspectors.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1192, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-118 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-109. Examinations - content.

Applicants shall pass such reasonable and practical examinations as may be prescribed by the board for certification. Examinations shall be designed to demonstrate whether the applicant possesses sufficient practical and theoretical knowledge for competent performance of the position for which certification is sought and whether the applicant has knowledge of the state and federal mine health and safety laws.

An applicant for certification as a mine foreman or fire boss in underground coal mines shall be sufficiently knowledgeable as to coal mining, mechanical equipment, the different systems of working and ventilating coal mines, the nature and properties of noxious, explosive, poisonous gases of mines, and the nature and properties of coal dust.

To qualify for certification, an applicant for certification as a shot-firer must be sufficiently knowledgeable as to explosives, breaking agents, and blasting accessories used in coal mines, the proper placement of drill holes made for the purpose of breaking or dislodging coal and rock, the digital gas detector and its use in detecting inflammables and noxious gases, and the proper ventilation in the working places of coal mines.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1192, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(3) amended, (HB 20-1208), ch. 119, p. 495, § 4, effective June 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-110 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-110. Examinations - notice - grading - filing.

Notice of examination shall be given by legible notices for a period of six months prior to the examination. The date and location of the examination shall be announced at least thirty days preceding the examination, and the conditions of eligibility shall be fully stated on the notices. Notices shall be furnished by the office of active and inactive mines and posted in a conspicuous place at each coal mine by the operator of such mine.

The office of active and inactive mines shall provide all candidates who take the examination with mathematical formulas to be used in the answering of questions given.

The examination papers of all applicants who earn certificates of competency shall be kept, with the complete list of questions and their correct solutions, by the office of active and inactive mines for a period of two years.

Application forms shall be provided by the office of active and inactive mines. Completed applications shall be returned at least fifteen days prior to the date of the examination.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1192, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1933, § 21, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-109 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-111. Certification fee.

Each individual taking an examination for certification as required in section 34-22-105 shall pay to the office of active and inactive mines a fee of twenty-five dollars for any initial examination or subsequent examinations required because of the failure to receive a passing grade. Renewals of certificates of competency where required shall be at no cost to the individual holding a valid certificate.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for the fee in subsection (1) of this section, the executive director of the department of natural resources by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of the fee if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of the fee is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department of natural resources by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of the fee as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1192, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1934, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1340, § 60, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-21-109 as it existed prior to 1988.

34-22-112. Examinations - applicant qualifications.

All candidates for examination for certification shall demonstrate at the time of the examination satisfactory eyesight and hearing consistent with the practice and needs of the coal mining industry.

Every applicant for certification as a mine foreman shall produce evidence satisfactory to the board of not less than three years' experience in mines or in operations determined by the board to be equivalent to coal mines. The experience of an applicant intending to work in underground mines must be in underground mining. The experience of an applicant intending to work in surface mining must be in surface mining.

A person who holds a college degree in engineering, which degree is determined by the board to be acceptable and suited to the intent and purpose of this article 22, who satisfies the board that the person has at least one year of actual and satisfactory experience in the operation of underground coal mines, including experience in mining, timbering, haulage, drainage, and ventilation and including experience in the capacity of mining engineer, is eligible for examination as a mine foreman in underground coal mines.

Every applicant for a fire boss certification shall provide evidence satisfactory to the board that he has at least three years' experience in gassy underground mines, one year of which will be in an underground coal mine.

Every applicant for a certificate of competency as a mine electrician shall have at least one year's experience in coal mines or noncoal mines or other electrical experience and:

Shall have been qualified as a coal mine electrician by another state that has a coal mine electrical qualification program equivalent to that of this state or a state program approved by the United States secretary of labor or his authorized representative; or

Shall be determined to be a person qualified to perform electrical work in underground or surface coal mines by the United States secretary of labor or his authorized representative; or

Shall be qualified by training, education, and experience to perform electrical work, maintain electrical equipment, and conduct examinations and tests of electrical equipment.

In the case of an applicant for a certificate of competency as an underground coal mine electrician, the requisite one year's experience shall be in underground mines.

All certified coal mine electricians shall attend annually an approved electrical retraining class to retain said certification.

Every applicant for certification as a shot-firer must have experience as defined by the board.

All hoistmen working in coal mines must be certified as follows:

Applicants must have experience and training as approved by the board or the United States mine safety and health administration.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 378, § 3, effective July 1, 1996.)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1193, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(6) and (7) amended, p. 378, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 20-1208), ch. 119, p. 495, § 5, effective June 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 34-21-109 and 34-21-114 as they existed prior to 1988.

34-22-113. Repeal of article - subject to review.

This article 22 is repealed, effective September 1, 2029. Before the repeal, this article 22 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1194, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 93, § 4, effective March 30.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 378, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 282, § 3, effective March 31.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1192), ch. 83, p. 235, § 24, effective April 14.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1208), ch. 119, p. 494, § 2, effective June 23.